Hawaii statutes.
§464-8 Qualifications for licensure.
(a) No person shall be eligible for licensure as a professional engineer
unless:

(1) The person is the holder of an unexpired license
issued to the person by any jurisdiction, domestic or foreign, in which the
requirements for licensure at the time the person was first licensed are of a
standard satisfactory to the board; provided that if the board is in doubt as
to whether the standards are satisfactory, or as to whether the holder was
required to fully comply with them, it shall require that the holder
successfully pass a written examination, prescribed by the board and designed
to test the holder's knowledge, skill, and competency in the profession of
engineering;

(2) The person is the holder of a master's degree in
engineering from an institution of higher education approved by the board; is a
graduate of a school or college approved by the board as of satisfactory
standing and has completed an engineering curriculum of four years or more; has
had three years of full-time lawful experience in engineering work of a
character satisfactory to the board, or part-time experience which the board
finds to be the equivalent thereof; and has successfully passed a written
examination, prescribed by the board and designed to test the person's
knowledge, skill, and competency in the profession of engineering;

(3) The person is the holder of a master's degree in
engineering from an institution of higher education approved by the board; has
had four years of full-time lawful experience in engineering work of a
character satisfactory to the board, or part-time experience which the board
finds to be the equivalent thereof; and has successfully passed a written
examination, prescribed by the board and designed to test the person's knowledge,
skill, and competency in the profession of engineering;

(4) The person is a graduate of a school or college
approved by the board as of satisfactory standing, and has completed an
engineering curriculum of four years or more; has had four years of full-time
lawful experience in engineering work of a character satisfactory to the board,
or part-time experience which the board finds to be the equivalent thereof; and
has successfully passed a written examination, prescribed by the board and
designed to test the person's knowledge, skill, and competency in the
profession of engineering;

(5) The person is a graduate of a school or college
approved by the board as of satisfactory standing, and has completed an
engineering technology or arts and science curriculum of four years or more;
has had eight years of full-time lawful experience in engineering work of a
character satisfactory to the board, or part-time experience which the board
finds to be the equivalent thereof; and has successfully passed a written
examination, prescribed by the board and designed to test the person's
knowledge, skill, and competency in the profession of engineering; or

(6) The person has had twelve years of full-time
lawful experience in engineering work of a character satisfactory to the board,
or part-time experience which the board finds to be the equivalent thereof; and
has successfully passed a written examination, prescribed by the board and
designed to test the person's knowledge, skill, and competency in the profession
of engineering.

(b) No person shall be eligible for licensure
as a professional architect unless:

(1) The person is the holder of an unexpired license
in architecture issued to the person by any jurisdiction, domestic or foreign,
and the person meets the requirements of this chapter and the rules of the
board;

(2) The person is the holder of a bachelor's,
master's, or higher degree in architecture from a school or college approved by
the board as of satisfactory standing; has had three years of full-time lawful
experience in architecture work of a character satisfactory to the board, or
part-time experience which the board finds to be the equivalent thereof; and
has successfully passed a professional written examination, prescribed by the
board and designed to test the person's knowledge, skill, and competency in the
profession of architecture;

(3) The person is a graduate of a school or college
approved by the board as of satisfactory standing and has completed an
architectural curriculum of four years or a pre-architecture or arts and
science curriculum of four years or more; has had five years of full-time
lawful experience in architecture work of a character satisfactory to the
board, or part-time experience which the board finds to be the equivalent
thereof; and has successfully passed a professional written examination,
prescribed by the board and designed to test the person's knowledge, skill, and
competency in the profession of architecture;

(4) The person is a graduate of a community college
or other technical training school approved by the board as of satisfactory
standing, and has completed an architectural technology curriculum of two years
or more; has had eight years of full-time lawful experience in architecture
work of a character satisfactory to the board, or part-time experience which
the board finds to be the equivalent thereof; and has successfully passed a
professional written examination, prescribed by the board and designed to test
the person's knowledge, skill, and competency in the profession of
architecture; or

(5) The person has had eleven years of full-time
lawful experience in architecture work of a character satisfactory to the
board, or part-time experience which the board finds to be the equivalent
thereof; and has successfully passed a professional written examination,
prescribed by the board and designed to test the person's knowledge, skill, and
competency in the profession of architecture;

provided that those persons who qualify under
paragraphs (2) through (5), as of June 30, 2000, shall be required to fulfill
the requirements of the intern development program of the National Council of
Architectural Registration Boards or of any similar program satisfactory to the
board, and approved by the board. For paragraph (2), the intern development
program shall fulfill the experience requirement. For paragraphs (3), (4), and
(5), time participating in the intern development program shall be credited
toward the experience requirement.

(c) No person shall be eligible for licensure
as a professional land surveyor unless:

(1) (A) The person is the holder of an unexpired
license issued to the person by any jurisdiction, domestic or foreign, in which
the requirements for licensure at the time the person was first licensed are of
a standard satisfactory to the board; provided that if the board is in doubt as
to whether the standards are satisfactory, or as to whether the holder was
required to fully comply with them, it shall require that the holder
successfully pass the national land surveyor licensing examinations and a
written, multiple-choice examination on the subject of Hawaii land matters and
Hawaii land description;

(B) The person is a graduate of a school or
college approved by the board as of satisfactory standing, and has completed a
geoscience, civil engineering, or general engineering curriculum of four years
or more; has had three years of full-time lawful experience in land surveying
of a character satisfactory to the board, or part-time experience which the
board finds to be the equivalent thereof; and has successfully passed the
national land surveyor licensing examinations and a written, multiple-choice
examination on the subject of Hawaii land matters and Hawaii land description;

(C) The person is a graduate of a school or
college approved by the board as of satisfactory standing, and has completed a
civil engineering technology (survey option) curriculum of two years or more or
arts and sciences curriculum of four years or more; has had seven years of
full-time lawful experience in land surveying of a character satisfactory to
the board, or part-time experience which the board finds to be the equivalent
thereof; and has successfully passed the national land surveyor licensing
examinations and a written, multiple-choice examination on the subject of
Hawaii land matters and Hawaii land description; or

(D) The person has had eleven years of
full-time lawful experience in land surveying of a character satisfactory to
the board, or part-time experience which the board finds to be the equivalent
thereof; and has successfully passed the national land surveyor licensing
examinations and a written, multiple-choice examination on the subject of
Hawaii land matters and Hawaii land description; and

(2) Any applicant shall certify on the application
that the applicant has read, understood, and agrees to comply with the laws and
rules that the board determines are required for licensure.

(d) No person shall be eligible for licensure
as a professional landscape architect unless:

(1) The person is the holder of an unexpired license
issued to the person by any jurisdiction, domestic or foreign, in which the
requirements for licensure at the time the person was first licensed are of a
standard satisfactory to the board; provided that if the board is in doubt as
to whether the standards are satisfactory, or as to whether the holder was
required to fully comply with them, it shall require that the holder
successfully pass the national landscape architect licensing examination and a written
examination, prescribed by the board designed to test the holder's knowledge of
the State's climatic conditions, native plants and native ecosystems, land use
ordinance and special management area requirements, and cultural and historical
conditions affecting landscape architecture;

(2) The person is the holder of a master's degree in
landscape architecture from an institution of higher education approved by the
board; is a graduate of a school or college approved by the board as of
satisfactory standing and has completed a landscape architectural curriculum of
four years or more; has had two years of full-time lawful experience in
landscape architecture work of a character satisfactory to the board, or
part-time experience which the board finds to be the equivalent thereof; and
has successfully passed the national landscape architect licensing examination
and a written examination, prescribed by the board designed to test the
person's knowledge of the State's climatic conditions, native plants and native
ecosystems, land use ordinance and special management area requirements, and
cultural and historical conditions affecting landscape architecture;

(3) The person is a graduate of a school or college
approved by the board as of satisfactory standing, and has completed a
landscape architectural curriculum of four years or more; has had three years
of full-time lawful experience in landscape architecture work of a character
satisfactory to the board, or part-time experience which the board finds to be the
equivalent thereof; and has successfully passed the national landscape
architect licensing examination and a written examination, prescribed by the
board designed to test the person's knowledge of the State's climatic
conditions, native plants and native ecosystems, land use ordinance and special
management area requirements, and cultural and historical conditions affecting
landscape architecture;

(4) The person is a graduate of a school or college
approved by the board as of satisfactory standing, and has completed a
pre-landscape architecture or arts and science curriculum of four years or
more; has had five years of full-time lawful experience in landscape
architecture work of a character satisfactory to the board, or part-time
experience which the board finds to be the equivalent thereof; and has
successfully passed the national landscape architect licensing examination and
a written examination, prescribed by the board designed to test the person's
knowledge of the State's climatic conditions, native plants and native
ecosystems, land use ordinance and special management area requirements, and
cultural and historical conditions affecting landscape architecture; or

(5) The person has had twelve years of full-time
lawful experience in landscape architecture work of a character satisfactory to
the board, or part-time experience which the board finds to be the equivalent
thereof; and has successfully passed the national landscape architect licensing
examination and a written examination, prescribed by the board designed to test
the person's knowledge of the State's climatic conditions, native plants and
native ecosystems, land use ordinance and special management area requirements,
and cultural and historical conditions affecting landscape architecture.

(6) The applicant shall also certify on the
application that the applicant has read, understood, and agrees to comply with
the laws and rules that the board determines are required for licensure.

In addition to the foregoing requirements, the
board, in its discretion, may also require additional proof that the applicant
is competent to practice professionally, and whenever the board is not fully
satisfied from the results of an examination that any applicant is competent to
practice professionally, it may give the applicant a further examination or
examinations.

No person shall be eligible for licensure as a
professional engineer, architect, land surveyor, or landscape architect if the
person does not possess a history of honesty, truthfulness, financial integrity,
and fair dealing. [L 1923, c 227, pt of §4; RL 1925, pt of §3686; am L 1931, c
165, pt of §2; RL 1935, pt of §7037; RL 1945, pt of §7609; am L 1949, c 306, pt
of §4; RL 1955, §166-8; HRS §464-8; am L 1970, c 85, §1; am L 1972, c 56, §1;
am L 1974, c 160, §1; am L 1983, c 155, §4; am L 1985, c 10, §1; am L 1986, c
164, §1; am L 1988, c 226, §5; am L 1989, c 210, §10; am L 1992, c 11, §2; am L
1997, c 263, §2; am L 1998, c 185, §1 and c 186, §1; am L 2001, c 135, §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next